Texas, session 892, HB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0091 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLAN. (a)  A youth camp operator shall: (1)  adopt and retain on the premises of the operator's youth camp a written emergency preparedness plan specific to that camp detailing procedures for responding to an emergency event, including: (A)  a natural disaster; (B)  a lost camper; (C)  a fire; (D)  a transportation emergency; (E)  a severe illness; (F)  a severe injury; (G)  an unauthorized or unknown individual present on the camp's premises; (H)  an aquatic emergency, if applicable to the camp; and (I)  an emergency specific to the camp's location or activities; and (2)  establish procedures to notify and communicate with the parents or legal guardians of each camper during an emergency. (b)  In developing an emergency preparedness plan under Subsection (a), a youth camp operator must: (1)  coordinate with appropriate local authorities and first responders in establishing the initial plan and in annually: (A)  updating the plan; (B)  submitting the initial or updated plan to the authorities; and (C)  conducting a walkthrough of the youth camp premises with the authorities; and (2)  annually submit the initial or updated plan to the department for approval in the form and manner the department prescribes. (c)  If the department determines a submitted emergency preparedness plan does not comply with this section, the youth camp operator shall revise and resubmit the plan not later than the 90th day after the date the operator receives notice from the department of the plan's deficiencies. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.